Missouri, session 2026, HB3014.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section 1. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell,
transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of
Missouri in property located in Nodaway County, Missouri. The property to be
conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Tract 1
Beginning at the North Quarter Corner Section 13, Township 64 North, Range 36
West, Nodaway County, Missouri; thence along Section Line, South 86 degrees
48 minutes 14 seconds East 1557.37 feet; thence departing said line, South 03
degrees 05 minutes 47 seconds West 1037.56 feet; thence South 59 degrees 30
minutes 04 seconds East 503.01 feet; thence South 18 degrees 22 minutes 57
seconds West 282.59 feet; thence along the northern right-of-way of the former
Norfolk & Western Railroad the following courses and distances: South 89
degrees 57 minutes 27 seconds West 229.70 feet; thence 532.26 feet by arc
distance along a curve to the right having a radius of 3224.02 feet and a chord
bearing of North 85 degrees 20 minutes 37 seconds West 531.66 feet; thence
North 80 degrees 35 minutes 32 seconds West 1145.21 feet; thence departing said
right-of-way and along Quarter Section Line, North 01 degrees 52 minutes 08
seconds East 1416.90 feet to the point beginning.
Tract 2
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3014 2
Commencing at the North Quarter Corner Section 13, Township 64 North,
Range 36 West, Nodaway County, Missouri; thence along Quarter Section Line,
South 01 degrees 52 minutes 08 seconds West 1416.90 feet to the Point of
Beginning; thence continuing along Quarter Section Line, South 01 degrees 52
minutes 08 seconds West 50.44 feet; thence along the centerline of the former
Norfolk & Western Railroad the following courses and distances: South 80
degrees 35 minutes 32 seconds East 1138.61 feet; thence 540.49 feet by arc
distance along a curve to the left having a radius of 3274.02 feet and a chord
bearing of South 85 degrees 20 minutes 36 seconds East 539.87 feet; thence North
89 degrees 57 minutes 27 seconds East 213.04 feet; thence departing said
centerline, North 18 degrees 22 minutes 57 seconds East 52.70 feet; thence along
the northern right-of-way of the former Norfolk & Western Railroad the
following courses and distances: South 89 degrees 57 minutes 27 seconds West
229.70 feet; thence 532.26 feet by arc distance along a curve to the right having a
radius of 3224.02 feet and a chord bearing of North 85 degrees 20 minutes 37
seconds West 531.66 feet; thence North 80 degrees 35 minutes 32 seconds West
1145.21 feet; to the point of beginning.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
✔